South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1044.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-10-88 (C) and (E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) Redevelopment fees may be remitted to the applicable redevelopment authority for any quarter beginning on or after the date that the applicable redevelopment authority first submits the information described in subsection (B) to the department. If the redevelopment authority fails to provide the department with the required statement within the requisite time limits, then no redevelopment fees must be remitted for that quarter. Notwithstanding subsection (A), the redevelopment fee remitted by the department in any fiscal year may not exceed the amount remitted in Fiscal Year 2014-2015. (E) For purposes of this section, "closed or realigned federal installation" means,: (1) until January 1, 2028,June 30, 2043, a federal defense site in which permanent employment was reduced by three thousand or more jobs from the level of such jobs on December 31, 1990, or a federal military base or installation which has been closed or realigned under: (a)(1) the Defense Base Closure and Realignment Act of 1990; (b)(2) Title 11 of the Defense Authorization Amendments and Base Closure and Realignment Act;  or (c)(3) Section 2687 of Title 10, United States Code. SECTION 2.  SECTION 15 of Act 356 of 2002 is amended to read: SECTION  15.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law the Charleston Naval Complex Redevelopment Authority (RDA), upon receiving ownership from the United States of America, shall convey certain parcels of real property to the City of North Charleston as per the mutual agreement described hereafter.  These parcels shall be delineated through a mutual agreement between the City of North Charleston and the South Carolina State Ports Authority that takes into account the respective needs of each entity in the property south of Necessary Street.  All conveyances shall be at no consideration once the City of North Charleston and the South Carolina State Ports Authority have entered into a memorandum of understanding and agreement for the operation of breakbulk, roll on roll off, and container terminals and dock operations on appropriate properties that are subject to the oversight or control of the Charleston Naval Complex Redevelopment Authority.  The City of North Charleston shall honor all existing leases as negotiated by the Charleston Naval Complex Redevelopment Authority prior to the effective date of this section.  Furthermore, all properties conveyed shall retain any Tax Increment Finance District status, any state or federal grants applied to the area, and any state revenues currently directed to the Charleston Redevelopment Authority on a per acre basis for the relative properties conveyed to the City of North Charleston.  In addition, any revenues received from the State under the Rural Development Act relating to the number of federal employees at the naval complex shall be shared pursuant to the location of the jobs on the complex. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----